test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VINIT_ishkodewidaabaan_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oishkodewidaabaanishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oishkodewidaabaanishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanishiniibanan
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanishiniibanag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanishiniibaning
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iishkodewidaabaanishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iishkodewidaabaanishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefishkodewidaabaan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iishkodewidaabaanishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanensimishinaaniban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaaiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanensimishiniiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanensimishini***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaaniban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaaiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishiniiban
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensimishinaanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensimishinaanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensimishinaaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaaan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaaag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensimishiwaaing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensimishinian
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensimishiniag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensimishiniing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishinaaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaaan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaaag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishiwaaing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishinian
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishiniag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensimishibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensimishibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensimishibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensimish***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensimish***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensimish***idig, idog***ing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhimishibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhimish***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensiminaanibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensiminaanibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensiminaanibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensimiwaaibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensimiwaaibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensimiwaaibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensiminiibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensiminiibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensiminiibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensimini***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensimini***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensimini***idig, idog***ing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminaanibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminaanibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminaanibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhimiwaaibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimiwaaibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhimiwaaibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminiibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminiibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhiminiibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhimini***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensishinaanibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensishinaanibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensishinaanibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensishiwaaibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensishiwaaibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensishiwaaibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensishiniibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensishiniibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensishiniibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanensishini***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanensishini***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanensishini***idig, idog***ing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhishinaanibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhishinaanibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhishinaanibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhishiwaaibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhishiwaaibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhishiwaaibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhishiniibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhishiniibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhishiniibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanenhishini***idig, idog***an
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanenhishini***idig, idog***ag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanenhishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanimishinaanibanan
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ishkodewidaabaanimishinaanibanag
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ishkodewidaabaanimishinaanibaning
     ishkodewidaabaan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ishkodewidaabaanimishinaan***idig, idog***an
